Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.642.070

Schools established under state-tribal education compacts.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW from:

(1) Implementing a policy of Indian preference in employment; or

(2) Prioritizing the admission of tribal members where capacity of the school's programs or facilities is not as large as demand.

[ 2013 c 242 s 6.]